Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-6508
License; training; required.

(1) An insurance producer shall not sell, solicit, or negotiate a pet insurance product until after the insurance producer is appropriately licensed and has completed the required training as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) A pet insurer shall ensure that its insurance producers are appropriately trained on the coverages and conditions of such insurer's pet insurance products and have received the training required in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) Training required for an insurance producer shall include information on:

(a) Preexisting conditions and waiting periods;

(b) The differences between pet insurance and noninsurance wellness programs;

(c) Hereditary disorders, congenital anomalies or disorders, and chronic conditions, and how pet insurance policies interact with such conditions or disorders; and

(d) Rating, underwriting, renewal, and other related administrative topics.

(4) An insurance producer that has satisfied substantially similar training requirements in another state shall be considered to have satisfied the training requirements in this state.

Laws 2023, LB296, § 8.